Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Division 2. Bonds

§ 36-8-230.
Authority to issue; terms.

The commission shall be empowered and is hereby authorized from time to time to issue its negotiable bonds for any of its public purposes, including the payment of the cost of the project and incidental expenses in connection therewith, and to secure the payment of the same by a lien or pledge covering all or part of its contracts or revenues. The commission shall have power from time to time whenever it deems refunding expedient, to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and may issue bonds partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any of its additional public purposes. The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the commission and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such times as may be determined by the commission, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the commission, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the commission prior to the issuance of the bonds. The commission shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds shall be signed by the chairman or vice-chairman of the commission or by their facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto or reproduced thereon and attested by the secretary and treasurer of the commission, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the facsimile signature of the chairman or vice-chairman of the commission. In case any officer whose signature or facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All bonds issued under the provisions of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the commission may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest. The commission may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the commission.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the commission may under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The commission may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

Any resolution or resolutions authorizing any bonds or any issue of bonds may contain provisions, which shall be a part of the contract with the holders of the bonds thereby authorized, as to:

Pledging all or any part of the moneys, earnings, income and revenues derived from the project of the commission to secure the payment of the bonds or of any issue of the bonds subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then exist;

The rates, rentals, admission fees and other charges to be fixed and collected and the amounts to be raised in each year thereby, and the use and disposition of the earnings and other revenues;

The setting aside of reserves and the creation of sinking funds and the regulation and disposition thereof;

Limitations on the right of the commission to restrict and regulate the use of the project;

Limitations in the purposes to which and the manner in which the proceeds of sale of any issue of bonds may be applied;

Limitations on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured; the refunding of outstanding or other bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The creation of special funds into which any earnings or revenues of the commission may be deposited;

The terms and provisions of any trust indenture securing the bonds or under which bonds may be issued;

Vesting in a trustee or trustees such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the commission may determine;

Defining the acts or omissions to act which shall constitute a default in the obligations and duties of the commission to the bondholders and providing the rights and remedies of the bondholders in the event of such default, including as a matter of right the appointment of a receiver, provided, however, that such rights and remedies shall not be inconsistent with the general laws of this state and other provisions of this act;

Limitations on the power of the commission to sell or otherwise dispose of the project, or any part thereof;

Any other matters, of like or different character which in any way affect the security or protection of the bonds;

Limitations on the amount of moneys derived from the project to be expended for operating, administrative or other expenses of the commission;

The protection and enforcement of the rights and remedies of the bondholders;

The obligations of the commission in relation to the acquisition, leasing, licensing, construction, maintenance, operation, repairs and insurance of the project, the safeguarding and application, of all moneys and as to the requirements for the supervision, managements, and approval of consulting engineers and others in connection with construction, reconstruction and operation;

The payment of the proceeds of bonds and revenues of the project to a trustee or other depository, and for the method of disbursement thereof with such safeguards and restrictions as the commission may determine.

It is the intention of the legislature that any pledge of earnings, revenues or other moneys made by the commission shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made; that the earnings, revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the commission shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and that the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the commission irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded.

Neither the members of the commission nor any person executing the bonds or other obligations shall be liable personally on the bonds or other obligations or be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of the issuance thereof.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the commission shall contain a covenant by the commission that it will at all times maintain rates, admission fees, rentals, and other charges sufficient to pay the cost of operation and maintenance of the project, the principal of and interest on any bonds issued pursuant to such resolution or resolutions as the same severally become due and payable, and to maintain any reserves or other funds required by the terms of such resolution or resolutions.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 18-2907; W.S. 1957, § 36-148.

Cross references. —

As to authority of commission to issue revenue bonds to pay cost of project, see §

36-8-207

.

§ 36-8-231.
Trust agreements generally.

In the discretion of the commission any bonds issued under the provisions of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the commission and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage the project or any part thereof. Any such trust agreement or any resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the commission in relation to the acquisition, leasing or licensing of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the project, the rates, admission fees, charges and rentals to be charged, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys, and provision for the employment of managers, and consulting engineers in connection with the construction or operation of the project. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state which may act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the commission. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of trusts, and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust agreements or trust indentures securing bonds or debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement may contain such other provisions as the commission may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the project.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 18-2908; W.S. 1957, § 36-149.

§ 36-8-232.
Rights of bondholders and trustees.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this act or by such trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the commission or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of rates, admission fees, rentals or other charges.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 18-2909; W.S. 1957, § 36-150.

§ 36-8-233.
Bonds and expenses not to be indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the state or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state or of any such political subdivision, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds pledged for their payment as authorized herein, unless such bonds are redeemed from the proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds or cancelled by refunding bonds issued in lieu thereof, issued under the provisions of this act, which refunding bonds shall be payable solely from funds pledged for their payment as authorized herein. All such revenue bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that neither the state nor the commission shall be obligated to pay the same or the interest thereon except from the revenues and funds of the commission, and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the state or any political subdivision thereof is pledged or may be pledged, to the payment of the principal of or interest on such bonds.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this act shall be payable solely from funds provided under the authority of this act, and nothing in this act contained shall be construed to authorize the commission to incur indebtedness or liability on behalf of or payable by the state or any political subdivision thereof.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 18-2910; W.S. 1957, § 36-151.

§ 36-8-234.
Bonds deemed legal investments and deposits.

Bonds issued by the commission under the provisions of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] are hereby made securities in which the state and all public officers, municipal corporations, political subdivisions and public bodies, all banks, bankers, trust companies, trust and loan associations, investment companies and others carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and insurance associations and others carrying on an insurance business, and all administrators, executors, guardians, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital belonging to them or within their control. The bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and may be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations is now or may hereafter be authorized.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 18-2912; W.S. 1957, § 36-152.

§ 36-8-235.
Pledge by state to bondholders.

The state of Wyoming does pledge to and agrees with the holders of the bonds issued pursuant to this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] that the state will not limit or alter the rights herein vested in the commission to acquire, lease, license, construct, improve, extend, reconstruct, maintain, repair and operate the project, to establish and collect the revenues, rates, rentals, admission fees and other charges referred to in this act and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of the bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of such bondholders, until the bonds together with interest thereon, interests on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders are fully met and discharged.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 18-2913; W.S. 1957, § 36-153.

§ 36-8-236.
Moneys deemed trust funds.

All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

], whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or as revenues, shall be deemed to be trust funds, to be held and applied solely as provided in this act. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue or the trust agreement securing such bonds shall provide that any officer to whom, or any bank or trust company to which, such moneys shall be paid shall act as trustee of such moneys and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this act and such resolution or trust agreement may provide.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 18-2914; W.S. 1957, § 36-154.

§ 36-8-237.
Statutory authority for issuance of bonds and fixing of charges.

This act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] without reference to other statutes of the state of Wyoming shall constitute full authority for the authorization and issuance of bonds hereunder, and no other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of bonds or other obligations or the deposit of the proceeds thereof, or in any way impeding or restricting the carrying out of the acts herein authorized to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings hereunder or acts done pursuant hereto, and the bonds may be issued under the provisions of this act without obtaining the consent of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, agency or officer of the state.

This act without reference to other statutes of the state of Wyoming shall constitute full authority for the fixing, altering, charging and collection by the commission of rates, fees, rentals and other charges for the use of the recreational areas and facilities of the project and the services rendered in connection therewith at reasonable and uniform rates, to be determined exclusively by the commission, and the commission shall have power and authority to fix, alter, charge and collect such rates, fees, rentals and other charges without obtaining the consent or approval of any department, division, commission, board, bureau, agency or officer of the state.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 18-2915; W.S. 1957, § 36-155.

§ 36-8-238.
Existing statutory powers.

The foregoing sections of this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-237

] shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized thereby, and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any power now existing except as in this act [§§

36-8-201

through

36-8-238

] specifically provided; provided, however, that the issuance of revenue bonds or revenue refunding bonds under the provisions of this act need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 177, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 18-2916; W.S. 1957, § 36-156.